District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Eviction Reform Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Title 16 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Section 16-1501(d) is amended by striking the phrase “the Court shall dismiss the
complaint.” and inserting the phrase “the Court may, in its discretion when weighing the
prejudice to all parties, dismiss the complaint.” in its place.
(b) Section 16-1502(a) is amended by striking the phrase “30 days,” and inserting the
phrase “10 days,”.
(c) A new Section 16-1502a is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 16-1502a. Protective orders and court registry payments.


“(a) At the initial hearing for a complaint for restitution of possession alleging
nonpayment of rent, the plaintiff shall be entitled as a matter of right, upon written or oral motion
to the Court, to the entry of a protective order requiring the defendant to deposit into the Court’s
registry the full monthly rent, in regular monthly intervals, from the initial hearing through the
conclusion of the case. If a motion for a protective order is made before the initial hearing, the
Court shall rule on the motion no later than the initial hearing date.
“(b)(1) Upon the plaintiff’s request for the entry of a protective order pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section, the defendant may challenge the amount of the protective order on
the basis of:
“(A) The rent level having been miscalculated or incorrectly asserted in
the plaintiff’s complaint; or
“(B) Alleged violations of the District’s property maintenance or housing
code.
“(2)(A) If the defendant asserts a defense under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1)
of this subsection, the Court shall issue the protective order in an amount required by subsection
(a) of this section and thereafter hold a hearing on the asserted defenses.
“(B) If, at or after the hearing held pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph, the Court finds that a defendant has proven the existence of housing or property
maintenance code violations, the presence of which justified a lower rent than was required by a
protective order entered under subsection (a) of this section, the Court shall, accounting for the
nature and duration of the housing or property maintenance code violations, refund any rent paid
by the tenant into the Court’s registry above the amount determined to be appropriate by the
Court.


“(3) A defendant will reserve the right to assert any other cognizable defense to
nonpayment of rent at trial.”.
Sec. 3. Title V of the Rental Housing Act of 1985, effective July 17, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-
10; D.C. Official Code § 42-3505.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 501 (D.C. Official Code § 42-3505.01) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(a)(1) Except as provided in this section and section 501b, no tenant shall be
evicted from a rental unit, notwithstanding the expiration of the tenant’s lease or rental
agreement, so long as the tenant continues to pay the rent to which the housing provider is
entitled for the rental unit; provided, that the nonpayment of a late fee shall not be the basis for
an eviction. No tenant shall be evicted from a rental unit for any reason unless the tenant has
been served with a written notice which meets the requirements of this section; provided, that
this shall not apply to evictions under section 501b. Notices for all reasons other than
nonpayment of rent shall be served upon both the tenant and the Rent Administrator; provided,
that this shall not apply to evictions under section 501b.”.
(B) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “shall dismiss a
claim” and inserting the phrase “may, in its discretion, dismiss a claim” in its place.
(b) A new section 501b (D.C. Official Code § 42-3505.01b) is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 501b. Expedited evictions for violent criminal activity.
“(a) A housing provider may recover possession of a rental unit pursuant to this section
where a court of competent jurisdiction has determined that the tenant, or a person occupying the


premises with or in addition to the tenant, has engaged in or facilitated violent criminal activity
on the premises. The housing provider shall serve on the tenant a 10-day notice to vacate.
“(b) After serving a notice to vacate pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, a housing
provider may file a complaint with a court of competent jurisdiction to recover possession of the
rental unit. The Court shall set the matter for a hearing, which shall be held on an expedited basis
within 20 days following the filing of the complaint.
“(c) It shall be a defense to an action for possession under this section if:
“(1) The tenant is a victim, or is the parent or guardian of a minor victim, of an
intrafamily offense or actions relating to an intrafamily offense, as defined in § 16-1001(8), if the
Court determines that the intrafamily offense, or actions relating to the intrafamily offense, are
the basis for the notice to vacate.
“(A) If, as a result of the intrafamily offense or the actions relating to the
intrafamily offense that is the basis for the notice to vacate, the tenant has received a temporary
or civil protection order ordering the respondent to vacate the home, the Court shall not enter a
judgment for possession;
“(B) If, as a result of the intrafamily offense or the actions relating to the
intrafamily offense that is the basis for the notice to vacate, the tenant provides to the Court a
copy of a police report written within the preceding 60 days or has filed for but has not received
100 a temporary or civil protection order ordering the respondent to vacate the home, the Court shall
101 have the discretion not to enter a judgment for possession under this section;
102 “(2) The tenant did not know or have reason to know that criminal activity was
103 occurring or would likely occur on the premises; or


104 “(3) The tenant had done everything that could reasonably be expected under such
105 circumstances to prevent the commission of violent criminal activity, such as requesting the
106 housing provider remove the offending household member’s name from the lease, reporting prior
107 criminal activity to the police, seeking assistance from social service or counseling agencies, or
108 denying permission, if feasible, for the offending household member to reside in the dwelling
109 unit.
110 “(d) If it is determined by a preponderance of the evidence that the tenant or occupant has
111 engaged in or facilitated violent criminal activity, the Court shall enter a final judgment for
112 possession and issue a writ of restitution that mandates the eviction of the tenant or occupant
113 within 20 days.
114 “(e) For purposes of this section, the term:
115 “(1) “Occupant” means a person authorized by the tenant or housing provider to
116 be on the premises of the rental unit.
117 “(2) “Premises” means a rental unit, its appurtenances, and the building, and the
118 grounds, areas, and facilities held out for the use of tenants generally.
119 “(3) “Rental unit” means an apartment, room, or part of a publicly or privately
120 owned housing accommodation that is rented or offered for rent for residential occupancy.
121 “(4) “Violent criminal activity” means a “dangerous crime” as defined in D.C.
122 Official Code § 23-1331(3) or a “crime of violence” as defined in D.C. Official Code § 23-
123 1331(4).”.
124 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.


125 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
126 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
127 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
128 Sec. 5. Effective date.
129 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
130 Mayor, action by Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
131 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
132 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
133 Columbia Register.